trunk/src/buckwalter scripts/convert2hunspell/arabic_alias.aff
FLAG num
AM IVPref-AnA-li>a+ # 221
AM IVPref-Antm-tu+ # 222
AM IVPref-Antm-litu+ # 223
AM +IVSuff-|k # 224
AM +PVSuff-~th # 225
AM +IVSuff-|n # 226
AM +NSuff-wn # 227
AM +Suff-0 # 228
AM +NSuff-atAn # 229
AM +IVSuff-ny-nA # 230
AM +IVSuff-wA # 231
AM +FWSuff-~A # 232
AM +IVSuff-Ah # 233
AM +IVSuff-h # 234
AM +IVSuff-nh # 235
AM +IVSuff-k # 236
AM +IVSuff-An # 237
AM +IVSuff-~n # 238
AM +IVSuff-A # 239
AM +IVSuff-nk # 240
AM +NSuff-Ah # 241
AM +NSuff-ap # 242
AM +PVSuff-awA # 243
AM +IVSuff-awnh # 244
AM +NSuff-An # 245
AM +FWSuff-~a # 246
AM +NSuff-iyh # 247
AM +IVSuff-awnk # 248
AM +IVSuff-wh # 249
AM +IVSuff-wk # 250
AM +NSuff-At # 251
AM +IVSuff-awA # 252
AM +NSuff-|th # 253
AM +IVSuff-wn # 254
AM +NSuff-|-ni # 255
AM +CVSuff-yh # 256
AM +IVSuff-|h # 257
AM +PVSuff-0ah # 258
AM +PVSuff-awh # 259
AM +NSuff-iyna # 260
AM +IVSuff-awh # 261
AM +IVSuff-| # 262
AM +IVSuff-awk # 263
AM +NSuff-wh # 264
AM +IVSuff-ynh # 265
AM +PVSuff-ath # 266
AM +IVSuff-n # 267
AM +NSuff-tayn # 268
AM +NSuff-ayn # 269
AM +IVSuff-awn # 270
AM +IVSuff-wnh # 271
AM +IVSuff-wnk # 272
AM +NSuff-atAh # 273
AM +NSuff-ath # 274
AM +PVSuff-uwA # 275
AM +IVSuff-~nh # 276
AM +IVSuff-y # 277
AM +IVSuff-~nk # 278
AM +PVSuff-~nh # 279
AM +PVSuff-uwh # 280
AM +PVSuff-ah # 281
AM +PVSuff-Ah # 282
AM +PVSuff-at # 283
AM +NSuff-iy # 284
AM +NSuff-|t # 285
AM +IVSuff-|nh # 286
AM +IVSuff-Ak # 287
AM +IVSuff-|nk # 288
AM +FWSuff-A # 289
AM +FWSuff-nA-us # 290
AM +FWSuff-~iy # 291
AM +PVSuff-A # 292
AM +FWSuff-k # 293
AM +NSuff-h # 294
AM +PVSuff-a # 295
AM +PVSuff-n # 296
AM +PVSuff-t # 297
AM +PVSuff-| # 298
AM +IVSuff-yh # 299
AM +NSuff-|h # 300
AM +FWSuff-iy-I # 301
AM +NSuff-ayh # 302
AM +CVSuff-wA # 303
AM +PVSuff-|h # 304
AM +PVSuff-th # 305
AM +PVSuff-0a # 306
AM +FWSuff-hi # 307
AM +CVSuff-wh # 308
AM +PVSuff-nh # 309
AM +CVSuff-oh # 310
AM +PVSuff-~n # 311
AM +NSuff-tay # 312
AM +PVSuff-~t # 313
AM +CVSuff-o # 314
AM +CVSuff-y # 315
AM +NSuff-Ath # 316
AM +IVSuff-Anh # 317
AM +FWSuff-iy-me # 318
AM +NSuff-AF # 319
AM +IVSuff-Ank # 320
AM +FWSuff-hu-he # 321
AM +FWSuff-hu-him # 322
AM +FWSuff-ya # 323
AM +IVSuff-yn # 324
AM +FWSuff-nA-we # 325
AM +FWSuff-niy-I # 326
AM +FWSuff-niy-me # 327
SET UTF-8
NEEDAFFIX 1
CIRCUMFIX 2
PFX 1013 Y 6
PFX 1013 0 y/143 . 160
PFX 1013 0 wy/143 . 160
PFX 1013 0 fy/143 . 160
PFX 1013 0 sy/143 . 160
PFX 1013 0 wsy/143 . 160
PFX 1013 0 fsy/143 . 160
PFX 1056 Y 12
PFX 1056 0 |/143 . 161
PFX 1056 0 w|/143 . 161
PFX 1056 0 f|/143 . 161
PFX 1056 0 s|/143 . 161
PFX 1056 0 ws|/143 . 161
PFX 1056 0 fs|/143 . 161
PFX 1056 0 A/143 . 161
PFX 1056 0 wA/143 . 161
PFX 1056 0 fA/143 . 161
PFX 1056 0 sA/143 . 161
PFX 1056 0 wsA/143 . 161
PFX 1056 0 fsA/143 . 161
PFX 1041 Y 3
PFX 1041 0 lt/143 . 162
PFX 1041 0 wlt/143 . 162
PFX 1041 0 flt/143 . 162
PFX 1004 Y 1
PFX 1004 0 l/143 . 163
PFX 1018 Y 3
PFX 1018 0 ly/143 . 164
PFX 1018 0 wly/143 . 164
PFX 1018 0 fly/143 . 164
PFX 1025 Y 3
PFX 1025 0 ly/143 . 165
PFX 1025 0 wly/143 . 165
PFX 1025 0 fly/143 . 165
PFX 1008 Y 3
PFX 1008 0 ll/143 . 166
PFX 1008 0 wll/143 . 166
PFX 1008 0 fll/143 . 166
PFX 1044 Y 3
PFX 1044 0 lt/143 . 167
PFX 1044 0 wlt/143 . 167
PFX 1044 0 flt/143 . 167
PFX 1058 Y 6
PFX 1058 0 l>/143 . 168
PFX 1058 0 wl>/143 . 168
PFX 1058 0 fl>/143 . 168
PFX 1058 0 lA/143 . 168
PFX 1058 0 wlA/143 . 168
PFX 1058 0 flA/143 . 168
PFX 1022 Y 3
PFX 1022 0 ly/143 . 169
PFX 1022 0 wly/143 . 169
PFX 1022 0 fly/143 . 169
PFX 1003 Y 3
PFX 1003 0 l/143 . 170
PFX 1003 0 wl/143 . 170
PFX 1003 0 fl/143 . 170
PFX 1020 Y 3
PFX 1020 0 ly/143 . 171
PFX 1020 0 wly/143 . 171
PFX 1020 0 fly/143 . 171
PFX 1005 Y 1
PFX 1005 0 l/143 . 172
PFX 1032 Y 6
PFX 1032 0 t/143 . 173
PFX 1032 0 wt/143 . 173
PFX 1032 0 ft/143 . 173
PFX 1032 0 st/143 . 173
PFX 1032 0 wst/143 . 173
PFX 1032 0 fst/143 . 173
PFX 1054 Y 12
PFX 1054 0 >/143 . 174
PFX 1054 0 w>/143 . 174
PFX 1054 0 f>/143 . 174
PFX 1054 0 s>/143 . 174
PFX 1054 0 ws>/143 . 174
PFX 1054 0 fs>/143 . 174
PFX 1054 0 A/143 . 174
PFX 1054 0 wA/143 . 174
PFX 1054 0 fA/143 . 174
PFX 1054 0 sA/143 . 174
PFX 1054 0 wsA/143 . 174
PFX 1054 0 fsA/143 . 174
PFX 1010 Y 6
PFX 1010 0 y/143 . 175
PFX 1010 0 wy/143 . 175
PFX 1010 0 fy/143 . 175
PFX 1010 0 sy/143 . 175
PFX 1010 0 wsy/143 . 175
PFX 1010 0 fsy/143 . 175
PFX 1019 Y 3
PFX 1019 0 ly/143 . 176
PFX 1019 0 wly/143 . 176
PFX 1019 0 fly/143 . 176
PFX 1045 Y 3
PFX 1045 0 lt/143 . 177
PFX 1045 0 wlt/143 . 177
PFX 1045 0 flt/143 . 177
PFX 1028 Y 6
PFX 1028 0 t/143 . 178
PFX 1028 0 wt/143 . 178
PFX 1028 0 ft/143 . 178
PFX 1028 0 st/143 . 178
PFX 1028 0 wst/143 . 178
PFX 1028 0 fst/143 . 178
PFX 1023 Y 3
PFX 1023 0 ly/143 . 179
PFX 1023 0 wly/143 . 179
PFX 1023 0 fly/143 . 179
PFX 1034 Y 6
PFX 1034 0 t/143 . 180
PFX 1034 0 wt/143 . 180
PFX 1034 0 ft/143 . 180
PFX 1034 0 st/143 . 180
PFX 1034 0 wst/143 . 180
PFX 1034 0 fst/143 . 180
PFX 1021 Y 3
PFX 1021 0 ly/143 . 181
PFX 1021 0 wly/143 . 181
PFX 1021 0 fly/143 . 181
PFX 1033 Y 6
PFX 1033 0 t/143 . 182
PFX 1033 0 wt/143 . 182
PFX 1033 0 ft/143 . 182
PFX 1033 0 st/143 . 182
PFX 1033 0 wst/143 . 182
PFX 1033 0 fst/143 . 182
PFX 1006 Y 3
PFX 1006 0 Al/143 . 183
PFX 1006 0 wAl/143 . 183
PFX 1006 0 fAl/143 . 183
PFX 1055 Y 12
PFX 1055 0 >/143 . 184
PFX 1055 0 w>/143 . 184
PFX 1055 0 f>/143 . 184
PFX 1055 0 s>/143 . 184
PFX 1055 0 ws>/143 . 184
PFX 1055 0 fs>/143 . 184
PFX 1055 0 A/143 . 184
PFX 1055 0 wA/143 . 184
PFX 1055 0 fA/143 . 184
PFX 1055 0 sA/143 . 184
PFX 1055 0 wsA/143 . 184
PFX 1055 0 fsA/143 . 184
PFX 1011 Y 6
PFX 1011 0 y/143 . 185
PFX 1011 0 wy/143 . 185
PFX 1011 0 fy/143 . 185
PFX 1011 0 sy/143 . 185
PFX 1011 0 wsy/143 . 185
PFX 1011 0 fsy/143 . 185
PFX 1026 Y 6
PFX 1026 0 t/143 . 186
PFX 1026 0 wt/143 . 186
PFX 1026 0 ft/143 . 186
PFX 1026 0 st/143 . 186
PFX 1026 0 wst/143 . 186
PFX 1026 0 fst/143 . 186
PFX 1016 Y 6
PFX 1016 0 y/143 . 187
PFX 1016 0 wy/143 . 187
PFX 1016 0 fy/143 . 187
PFX 1016 0 sy/143 . 187
PFX 1016 0 wsy/143 . 187
PFX 1016 0 fsy/143 . 187
PFX 1042 Y 3
PFX 1042 0 lt/143 . 188
PFX 1042 0 wlt/143 . 188
PFX 1042 0 flt/143 . 188
PFX 1029 Y 6
PFX 1029 0 t/143 . 189
PFX 1029 0 wt/143 . 189
PFX 1029 0 ft/143 . 189
PFX 1029 0 st/143 . 189
PFX 1029 0 wst/143 . 189
PFX 1029 0 fst/143 . 189
PFX 1060 Y 6
PFX 1060 0 n/143 . 190
PFX 1060 0 wn/143 . 190
PFX 1060 0 fn/143 . 190
PFX 1060 0 sn/143 . 190
PFX 1060 0 wsn/143 . 190
PFX 1060 0 fsn/143 . 190
PFX 1035 Y 6
PFX 1035 0 t/143 . 191
PFX 1035 0 wt/143 . 191
PFX 1035 0 ft/143 . 191
PFX 1035 0 st/143 . 191
PFX 1035 0 wst/143 . 191
PFX 1035 0 fst/143 . 191
PFX 1014 Y 6
PFX 1014 0 y/143 . 192
PFX 1014 0 wy/143 . 192
PFX 1014 0 fy/143 . 192
PFX 1014 0 sy/143 . 192
PFX 1014 0 wsy/143 . 192
PFX 1014 0 fsy/143 . 192
PFX 1046 Y 3
PFX 1046 0 lt/143 . 193
PFX 1046 0 wlt/143 . 193
PFX 1046 0 flt/143 . 193
PFX 1027 Y 6
PFX 1027 0 t/143 . 194
PFX 1027 0 wt/143 . 194
PFX 1027 0 ft/143 . 194
PFX 1027 0 st/143 . 194
PFX 1027 0 wst/143 . 194
PFX 1027 0 fst/143 . 194
PFX 1017 Y 6
PFX 1017 0 y/143 . 195
PFX 1017 0 wy/143 . 195
PFX 1017 0 fy/143 . 195
PFX 1017 0 sy/143 . 195
PFX 1017 0 wsy/143 . 195
PFX 1017 0 fsy/143 . 195
PFX 1043 Y 3
PFX 1043 0 lt/143 . 196
PFX 1043 0 wlt/143 . 196
PFX 1043 0 flt/143 . 196
PFX 1052 Y 3
PFX 1052 0 lt/143 . 197
PFX 1052 0 wlt/143 . 197
PFX 1052 0 flt/143 . 197
PFX 1030 Y 6
PFX 1030 0 t/143 . 198
PFX 1030 0 wt/143 . 198
PFX 1030 0 ft/143 . 198
PFX 1030 0 st/143 . 198
PFX 1030 0 wst/143 . 198
PFX 1030 0 fst/143 . 198
PFX 1048 Y 3
PFX 1048 0 lt/143 . 199
PFX 1048 0 wlt/143 . 199
PFX 1048 0 flt/143 . 199
PFX 1062 Y 3
PFX 1062 0 ln/143 . 200
PFX 1062 0 wln/143 . 200
PFX 1062 0 fln/143 . 200
PFX 1061 Y 6
PFX 1061 0 n/143 . 201
PFX 1061 0 wn/143 . 201
PFX 1061 0 fn/143 . 201
PFX 1061 0 sn/143 . 201
PFX 1061 0 wsn/143 . 201
PFX 1061 0 fsn/143 . 201
PFX 1015 Y 6
PFX 1015 0 y/143 . 202
PFX 1015 0 wy/143 . 202
PFX 1015 0 fy/143 . 202
PFX 1015 0 sy/143 . 202
PFX 1015 0 wsy/143 . 202
PFX 1015 0 fsy/143 . 202
PFX 1001 Y 2
PFX 1001 0 w/143 . 203
PFX 1001 0 f/143 . 203
PFX 1047 Y 3
PFX 1047 0 lt/143 . 204
PFX 1047 0 wlt/143 . 204
PFX 1047 0 flt/143 . 204
PFX 1038 Y 6
PFX 1038 0 t/143 . 205
PFX 1038 0 wt/143 . 205
PFX 1038 0 ft/143 . 205
PFX 1038 0 st/143 . 205
PFX 1038 0 wst/143 . 205
PFX 1038 0 fst/143 . 205
PFX 1059 Y 6
PFX 1059 0 l|/143 . 206
PFX 1059 0 wl|/143 . 206
PFX 1059 0 fl|/143 . 206
PFX 1059 0 lA/143 . 206
PFX 1059 0 wlA/143 . 206
PFX 1059 0 flA/143 . 206
PFX 1053 Y 3
PFX 1053 0 lt/143 . 207
PFX 1053 0 wlt/143 . 207
PFX 1053 0 flt/143 . 207
PFX 1031 Y 6
PFX 1031 0 t/143 . 208
PFX 1031 0 wt/143 . 208
PFX 1031 0 ft/143 . 208
PFX 1031 0 st/143 . 208
PFX 1031 0 wst/143 . 208
PFX 1031 0 fst/143 . 208
PFX 1009 Y 3
PFX 1009 0 l/143 . 209
PFX 1009 0 wl/143 . 209
PFX 1009 0 fl/143 . 209
PFX 1049 Y 3
PFX 1049 0 lt/143 . 210
PFX 1049 0 wlt/143 . 210
PFX 1049 0 flt/143 . 210
PFX 1036 Y 6
PFX 1036 0 t/143 . 211
PFX 1036 0 wt/143 . 211
PFX 1036 0 ft/143 . 211
PFX 1036 0 st/143 . 211
PFX 1036 0 wst/143 . 211
PFX 1036 0 fst/143 . 211
PFX 1063 Y 3
PFX 1063 0 ln/143 . 212
PFX 1063 0 wln/143 . 212
PFX 1063 0 fln/143 . 212
PFX 1050 Y 3
PFX 1050 0 lt/143 . 213
PFX 1050 0 wlt/143 . 213
PFX 1050 0 flt/143 . 213
PFX 1012 Y 6
PFX 1012 0 y/143 . 214
PFX 1012 0 wy/143 . 214
PFX 1012 0 fy/143 . 214
PFX 1012 0 sy/143 . 214
PFX 1012 0 wsy/143 . 214
PFX 1012 0 fsy/143 . 214
PFX 1039 Y 6
PFX 1039 0 t/143 . 215
PFX 1039 0 wt/143 . 215
PFX 1039 0 ft/143 . 215
PFX 1039 0 st/143 . 215
PFX 1039 0 wst/143 . 215
PFX 1039 0 fst/143 . 215
PFX 1002 Y 6
PFX 1002 0 b/143 . 216
PFX 1002 0 k/143 . 216
PFX 1002 0 wb/143 . 216
PFX 1002 0 fb/143 . 216
PFX 1002 0 wk/143 . 216
PFX 1002 0 fk/143 . 216
PFX 1000 Y 1
PFX 1000 0 0/143 . 217
PFX 1040 Y 3
PFX 1040 0 lt/143 . 218
PFX 1040 0 wlt/143 . 218
PFX 1040 0 flt/143 . 218
PFX 1024 Y 3
PFX 1024 0 ly/143 . 219
PFX 1024 0 wly/143 . 219
PFX 1024 0 fly/143 . 219
PFX 1007 Y 6
PFX 1007 0 bAl/143 . 220
PFX 1007 0 kAl/143 . 220
PFX 1007 0 wbAl/143 . 220
PFX 1007 0 fbAl/143 . 220
PFX 1007 0 wkAl/143 . 220
PFX 1007 0 fkAl/143 . 220
PFX 1057 Y 6
PFX 1057 0 l>/143 . 221
PFX 1057 0 wl>/143 . 221
PFX 1057 0 fl>/143 . 221
PFX 1057 0 lA/143 . 221
PFX 1057 0 wlA/143 . 221
PFX 1057 0 flA/143 . 221
PFX 1037 Y 6
PFX 1037 0 t/143 . 222
PFX 1037 0 wt/143 . 222
PFX 1037 0 ft/143 . 222
PFX 1037 0 st/143 . 222
PFX 1037 0 wst/143 . 222
PFX 1037 0 fst/143 . 222
PFX 1051 Y 3
PFX 1051 0 lt/143 . 223
PFX 1051 0 wlt/143 . 223
PFX 1051 0 flt/143 . 223
SFX 497 Y 5
SFX 497 0 k/144 . 224
SFX 497 0 k/144 . 224
SFX 497 0 kmA/144 . 224
SFX 497 0 km/144 . 224
SFX 497 0 kn/144 . 224
SFX 147 Y 45
SFX 147 0 h/145 . 225
SFX 147 0 hmA/145 . 225
SFX 147 0 hm/145 . 225
SFX 147 0 hA/145 . 225
SFX 147 0 hn/145 . 225
SFX 147 0 h/145 . 225
SFX 147 0 hmA/145 . 225
SFX 147 0 hm/145 . 225
SFX 147 0 hA/145 . 225
SFX 147 0 hn/145 . 225
SFX 147 0 h/145 . 225
SFX 147 0 hmA/145 . 225
SFX 147 0 hm/145 . 225
SFX 147 0 hA/145 . 225
SFX 147 0 hn/145 . 225
SFX 147 0 k/145 . 225
SFX 147 0 k/145 . 225
SFX 147 0 kmA/145 . 225
SFX 147 0 km/145 . 225
SFX 147 0 kn/145 . 225
SFX 147 0 ny/145 . 225
SFX 147 0 nA/145 . 225
SFX 147 0 ny/145 . 225
SFX 147 0 nA/145 . 225
SFX 147 0 mAh/145 . 225
SFX 147 0 mAhmA/145 . 225
SFX 147 0 mAhm/145 . 225
SFX 147 0 mAhA/145 . 225
SFX 147 0 mAhn/145 . 225
SFX 147 0 mAny/145 . 225
SFX 147 0 mAnA/145 . 225
SFX 147 0 mwh/145 . 225
SFX 147 0 mwhmA/145 . 225
SFX 147 0 mwhm/145 . 225
SFX 147 0 mwhA/145 . 225
SFX 147 0 mwhn/145 . 225
SFX 147 0 mwny/145 . 225
SFX 147 0 mwnA/145 . 225
SFX 147 0 nh/145 . 225
SFX 147 0 nhmA/145 . 225
SFX 147 0 nhm/145 . 225
SFX 147 0 nhA/145 . 225
SFX 147 0 nhn/145 . 225
SFX 147 0 nny/145 . 225
SFX 147 0 nnA/145 . 225
SFX 498 Y 1
SFX 498 0 n/144 . 226
SFX 182 Y 1
SFX 182 0 wn/146 . 227
SFX 344 Y 1
SFX 344 0 0/147 . 228
SFX 189 Y 1
SFX 189 0 tAn/146 . 229
SFX 563 Y 2
SFX 563 0 ny/148 . 230
SFX 563 0 nA/148 . 230
SFX 357 Y 1
SFX 357 0 wA/149 . 231
SFX 174 Y 1
SFX 174 0 A/145 . 232
SFX 398 Y 7
SFX 398 0 Ah/150 . 233
SFX 398 0 AhmA/150 . 233
SFX 398 0 Ahm/150 . 233
SFX 398 0 AhA/150 . 233
SFX 398 0 Ahn/150 . 233
SFX 398 0 Any/150 . 233
SFX 398 0 AnA/150 . 233
